Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Quiet Title, Land Boundaries, and Adverse Possession.

Collateral references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d, Adverse Possession, § 1 et seq.

65 Am. Jur. 2d, Quieting Title and Determination of Adverse Claims, § 1 et seq.

2 C.J.S., Adverse Possession, § 1 et seq.

74 C.J.S., Quieting Title, § 1 et seq.

Adverse possession by religious society, 4 ALR2d 123.

Adverse possession by mortgage before foreclosure, 7 ALR2d 1131.

Recording statutes as affecting title by adverse possession, 9 ALR2d 850.

Tacking adverse possession of area not within description of deed or contract, 17 ALR2d 1128.

Sufficiency, as regards continuity, of seasonal possession other than for agricultural or logging purposes, 24 ALR2d 632.

Possession by stranger claiming under conveyance by cotenant as adverse to other cotenants, 32 ALR2d 1214.

Acquisition of title to mines or minerals, 35 ALR2d 124.

Possession of mortgagor or successor in interest as adverse to purchaser at foreclosure sale, 38 ALR2d 348.

Adverse possession of landlord as affected by tenant’s recognition of title of third person, 38 ALR2d 826.

Void tax deed, tax sale certificate, and the like, as constituting color of title, 38 ALR2d 986.

Grantor’s possession as adverse possession against grantee, 39 ALR2d 353.

Defense of adverse possession or statute of limitations as available under general denial or plea of general issue in ejectment action, 39 ALR2d 1426.

Reputation as to ownership or claim as admissible on question of adverse possession, 40 ALR2d 770.

Acquisition of title to ground through adverse possession by cemetery or graveyard authorities, 41 ALR2d 925.

Adverse possession by donee under parol gift of land, 43 ALR2d 6.

Adverse possession of executor or administrator as continuous with that of ancestor and heirs, 43 ALR2d 1061.

Conveyance of land as bounded by road, street, or other way as giving grantee rights in or to such way, 46 ALR2d 461.

Tax sales or forfeitures by or to governmental units as interrupting adverse possession, 50 ALR2d 600.

Maintainability by lessee of action to quiet title to leasehold, 51 ALR2d 1227.

Acquisition by adverse possession or use of public property held by governmental unit otherwise than for streets, alleys, parks, or common, 55 ALR2d 554.

What acts, claims, circumstances, instruments, color of title, judgment, or thing of record will ground adverse possession in life tenant as against remaindermen or reversioners, 58 ALR2d 299.

Apportionment and division of area of river as between riparian tracts fronting on same bank, in absence of agreement or specification, 65 ALR2d 143.

Forged deed or bond for title as constituting color of title, 68 ALR2d 452.

Solid mineral royalty as real or personal property for purposes of prescription, 68 ALR2d 734.

Rights and remedies of one purchasing at judicial or execution sale where there was misrepresentation or mistake as to acreage or location of boundaries of tract sold, 69 ALR2d 254.

Judgment on decree as constituting color of title, 71 ALR2d 404.

Adverse possession of executor or administrator as against deceased owner’s heirs or devisees, 73 ALR2d 1097.

Adverse possession involving ignorance or mistake as to boundaries — modern views, 80 ALR2d 1171.

Adverse possession between cotenants, 82 ALR2d 5.

Adverse possession of railroad’s right of way by another, 95 ALR2d 479.

Adverse possession based on encroachment of building or other structure, 2 ALR3d 1005.

When does cause of action accrue for purposes of statute of limitations, against action based upon encroachment of building or other structure upon land of another, 12 ALR3d 1265.

Acquisition of title to land by adverse possession by state or other governmental unit or agency, 18 ALR3d 678.

Rights and liabilities of adjoining landowners as to trees, shrubbery, or similar rights growing on boundary line, 26 A.L.R.3d 1372.

Grazing of livestock or gathering of natural crop as fulfilling traditional elements of adverse possession, 48 ALR3d 818.

Use of property by public as affecting acquisition of title by adverse possession, 56 ALR3d 1182.

Right to accretion built up from one tract of land and extending laterally in front of adjoining tract without being contiguous thereto, 61 ALR3d 1173.

Riparian owner’s right to new land created by reliction or by accretion influenced by artificial condition not produced by such owner, 63 ALR3d 249.

Description in deed as relating to magnetic or true meridian, 70 ALR3d 1220.

Necessary or proper parties to suit or proceeding to establish private boundary line, 73 ALR3d 948.

Owner’s surveying of land as entry thereon tolling running of statute of limitations for purposes of adverse possession, 76 ALR3d 1202.

Description of land conveyed by reference to river or stream as carrying to thread or center or only to bank thereof — modern status, 78 ALR3d 604.

Fence as factor in fixing location of boundary line — modern cases, 7 ALR4th 53.

Validity and construction of statutes providing for reversion of mineral estates for abandonment or nonuse, 16 ALR4th 1029.

Construction and effect of “marketable record title” statutes, 31 ALR4th 11.

Sec. 09.45.010.
Action to quiet title.

A person in possession of real property, or a tenant of that person, may bring an action against another who claims an adverse estate or interest in the property for the purpose of determining the claim.

History.

(§ 6.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For forcible entry and detainer, see AS

09.45.060

—

09.45.160

; for adverse possession, see AS

09.10.030

and AS

09.45.052

; for ejectment, see AS

09.45.630

.

Sec. 09.45.015.
Land adjoining highway reservation.

A conveyance of land after April 7, 1958, that, at the time the conveyance was made, adjoined a highway reservation listed in section 1 of Public Land Order 1613 of the Secretary of the Interior (April 7, 1958), is presumed to have conveyed land up to the center-line of the highway subject to any highway reservation created by Public Land Order 601 and any highway easement created by Public Land Order 1613.

The burden of proof in litigation involving land adjoining a highway reservation created by Public Land Order 601 or a highway easement created by Public Land Order 1613 is on the person who claims that the conveyance did not convey an interest in land up to the center-line of the highway.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1986)

Sec. 09.45.020.
Action to establish boundaries.

When a dispute exists between two or more owners of adjacent or contiguous lands concerning the boundary lines of their lands, an owner may bring an action for the purpose of having the dispute determined and the boundary lines ascertained and marked.

History.

(§ 6.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For law in effect from August 23, 1995 through December 31, 1998 relating to determination of subdivision boundaries where the survey was manifestly defective, see ch. 43, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 09.45.030.
Appointment of referees to establish and mark boundaries.

In an action to establish boundaries, the court shall appoint three disinterested referees, one of whom is a surveyor, to establish and mark the boundary lines as ascertained and determined by the court.

History.

(§ 6.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For court rule on appointment of masters, and procedures, see Civ. R. 53.

Sec. 09.45.040.
Oaths and report of referees.

Before entering upon the discharge of their duties, the referees shall file a written oath to faithfully and impartially perform their duties.
After designating the boundary lines by proper marks, they shall file with the court a report describing the location of the marks.

History.

(§ 6.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.050.
Court action on the referees’ report.

The report may be confirmed unless a party excepts to the report.
Upon the hearing, the court may confirm, modify, or set aside the report, and, in the latter case, may appoint new referees or refer the matter to the same referees with appropriate instructions.

History.

(§ 6.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.052.
Adverse possession.

The uninterrupted adverse notorious possession of real property under color and claim of title for seven years or more, or the uninterrupted adverse notorious possession of real property for 10 years or more because of a good faith but mistaken belief that the real property lies within the boundaries of adjacent real property owned by the adverse claimant, is conclusively presumed to give title to the property except as against the state or the United States. For the purpose of this section, land that is in the trust established by the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act of 1956, P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709, is land owned by the state.

Except for an easement created by Public Land Order 1613, adverse possession will lie against property that is held by a person who holds equitable title from the United States under paragraphs 7 and 8 of Public Land Order 1613 of the Secretary of the Interior (April 7, 1958).

Notwithstanding AS

09.10.030

, the uninterrupted adverse notorious use of real property by a public utility for utility purposes for a period of 10 years or more vests in that utility an easement in that property for that purpose.

Notwithstanding AS

09.10.030

, the uninterrupted adverse notorious use, including construction, management, operation, or maintenance, of private land for public transportation or public access purposes, including highways, streets, roads, or trails, by the public, the state, or a political subdivision of the state, for a period of 10 years or more, vests an appropriate interest in that land in the state or a political subdivision of the state. This subsection does not limit or expand the rights of a state or political subdivision under adverse possession or prescription as the law existed on July 17, 2003.

History.

(§ 3.15 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 141 SLA 1986; am § 58 ch 66 SLA 1991; am §§ 3, 4 ch 147 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

09.25.050

. Renumbered in 1994.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing recovery of property in 10 years, see AS

09.10.030

; for provisions that a municipality may not be divested of title to real property by adverse possession, see AS

29.71.010

; for setoff for improvements made by one claiming under color of title, see AS

09.45.640

.